Nebraska, session 109, LB240.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 18-2147, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
18-2147 (1) Any redevelopment plan as originally approved or as later
modified pursuant to section 18-2117 may contain a provision that any ad
valorem tax levied upon real property, or any portion thereof, in a
redevelopment project for the benefit of any public body shall be divided, for
the applicable period described in subsection (4) of this section, as follows:
(a) That portion of the ad valorem tax which is produced by the levy at
the rate fixed each year by or for each such public body upon the redevelopment
project valuation shall be paid into the funds of each such public body in the
same proportion as are all other taxes collected by or for the body. When there
is not a redevelopment project valuation on a parcel or parcels, the county
assessor shall determine the redevelopment project valuation based upon the
fair market valuation of the parcel or parcels as of January 1 of the year
prior to the year that the ad valorem taxes are to be divided. The county
assessor shall provide written notice of the redevelopment project valuation to
the authority as defined in section 18-2103 and the owner. The authority or
owner may protest the valuation to the county board of equalization within
thirty days after the date of the valuation notice. All provisions of section
77-1502 except dates for filing of a protest, the period for hearing protests,
and the date for mailing notice of the county board of equalization's decision
are applicable to any protest filed pursuant to this section. The county board
of equalization shall decide any protest filed pursuant to this section within
thirty days after the filing of the protest. The county clerk shall mail a copy
of the decision made by the county board of equalization on protests pursuant
to this section to the authority or owner within seven days after the board's
decision. Any decision of the county board of equalization may be appealed to
the Tax Equalization and Review Commission, in accordance with section 77-5013,
within thirty days after the date of the decision;
(b) That portion of the ad valorem tax on real property, as provided in
the redevelopment contract, bond resolution, or redevelopment plan, as
applicable, in the redevelopment project in excess of such amount, if any,
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into a special fund of the
authority to be used solely to pay the principal of, the interest on, and any
premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans, notes, or advances of
money to, or indebtedness incurred by, whether funded, refunded, assumed, or
otherwise, such authority for financing or refinancing, in whole or in part,
the redevelopment project. When such bonds, loans, notes, advances of money, or
indebtedness, including interest and premiums due, have been paid, the
authority shall so notify the county assessor and county treasurer and all ad
valorem taxes upon taxable real property in such a redevelopment project shall
be paid into the funds of the respective public bodies. An authority may use a
single fund for purposes of this subdivision for all redevelopment projects or
may use a separate fund for each redevelopment project; and
(c) Any interest and penalties due for delinquent taxes shall be paid into
the funds of each public body in the same proportion as are all other taxes
collected by or for the public body.
(2) To the extent that a redevelopment plan authorizes the division of ad
valorem taxes levied upon only a portion of the real property included in such
redevelopment plan, any improvements funded by such division of taxes shall be
related to the redevelopment plan that authorized such division of taxes.
(3)(a) For any redevelopment plan located in a city of the metropolitan
class that includes a division of taxes, as provided in this section, that
produces, in whole or in part, funds to be used directly or indirectly for (i)
new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of housing for households with
annual incomes below the area median income for households and located within
six hundred yards of a public passenger streetcar or (ii) new construction,
rehabilitation, or acquisition of single-family housing or condominium housing
used as primary residences for individuals with annual incomes below the area
median income for individuals, such housing shall be deemed related to the
redevelopment plan that authorized such division of taxes regardless of whether
such housing is or will be located on real property within such redevelopment
plan, as long as such housing supports activities occurring on or identified in
such redevelopment plan.
(b) During each fiscal year in which the funds described in subdivision
(a) of this subsection are available, the authority and city shall make best
efforts to allocate not less than thirty percent of such funds to single-family
-1-

LB240 LB240
2025 2025
housing deemed related to the redevelopment plan described under such
subdivision.
(c) In selecting projects to receive funding, the authority and city shall
develop a qualified allocation plan and give first priority to financially
viable projects that serve the lowest income occupants for the longest period
of time.
(4)(a) For any redevelopment plan for which more than fifty percent of the
property in the redevelopment project area has been declared an extremely
blighted area in accordance with section 18-2101.02, ad valorem taxes shall be
divided for a period not to exceed twenty years after the effective date as
identified in the project redevelopment contract or in the resolution of the
authority authorizing the issuance of bonds pursuant to section 18-2124.
(b) For all other redevelopment plans, ad valorem taxes shall be divided
for a period not to exceed fifteen years after the effective date as identified
in the project redevelopment contract, in the resolution of the authority
authorizing the issuance of bonds pursuant to section 18-2124, or in the
redevelopment plan, whichever is applicable.
(5) The effective date of a provision dividing ad valorem taxes as
provided in subsection (4) of this section shall not occur until such time as
the real property in the redevelopment project is within the corporate
boundaries of the city. This subsection shall not apply to a redevelopment
project involving a formerly used defense site as authorized in section
18-2123.01.
(6) All Beginning August 1, 2006, all notices of the provision for
dividing ad valorem taxes shall be sent by the authority to the county assessor
on forms prescribed by the Property Tax Administrator. The notice shall be sent
to the county assessor on or before July August 1 of the year of the effective
date of the provision. Failure to satisfy the notice requirement of this
section shall result in the taxes, for all taxable years affected by the
failure to give notice of the effective date of the provision, remaining
undivided and being paid into the funds for each public body receiving property
taxes generated by the property in the redevelopment project. However, the
redevelopment project valuation for the remaining division of ad valorem taxes
in accordance with subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of this section shall be the
last certified valuation for the taxable year prior to the effective date of
the provision to divide the taxes for the remaining portion of the twenty-year
or fifteen-year period pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 18-2147, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-2-